Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.550

Volunteer firefighters—Call to duty.

An agency must allow an employee who is a volunteer firefighter to respond, without pay, to a fire, natural disaster, or medical emergency when called to duty. The agency may choose to grant leave with pay.

[ 2007 c 112 s 1.]